lt-LT: Bengalinių ugnelių forma: Širdis; Raidė; Skaičius; Spiralė; Žvaigždė; Lazdelė (tiesi); Ratas; Kita
cs: Tvar prskavky: Srdce; Písmeno; Číslice; Spirála; Hvězda; Tyčinka (rovná); Kolo; Jiné
pt-BR: Estrelinha formato: Coração; Letra; Número; Espiral; Estrela; Bastão (reto); Roda; Outros
sv: Tomteblossets form: Hjärta; Bokstav; Siffra; Spiral; Stjärna; Pinne (rak); Hjul; Annat
it: Forma stellina scintillante: Cuore; Lettera; Numero; Spirale; Stella; Bastoncino (dritto); Ruota; Altro
th: รูปทรงพลุไฟ: รูปหัวใจ; ตัวอักษร; ตัวเลข; เกลียว; รูปดาว; แท่ง (ตรง); วงล้อ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Forma artificiului de mână: Inimă; Literă; Număr; Spirală; Stea; Băț (drept); Roată; Altele
zh-TW: 仙女棒形狀: 心形; 字母; 數字; 螺旋形; 星形; 棒狀 (直); 輪形; 其他
hu: Csillagszóró formája: Szív; Betű; Szám; Spirál; Csillag; Pálca (egyenes); Kerék; Egyéb
zh-CN: 火花器形状: 心形; 字母; 数字; 螺旋形; 星形; 棒状（直）; 轮形; 其他
nl: Sterretje vorm: Hart; Letter; Cijfer; Spiraal; Ster; Stok (recht); Wiel; Overige
sk-SK: Tvar prskaviek: Srdce; Písmeno; Číslo; Špirála; Hviezda; Tyčinka (rovná); Koleso; Iný
hr-HR: Oblik prskalice: Srce; Slovo; Broj; Spirala; Zvijezda; Štapić (ravni); Kotač; Ostalo
da: Stjernekasterform: Hjerte; Bogstav; Tal; Spiral; Stjerne; Pind (lige); Hjul; Andet
es: Formas de bengalas: Corazón; Letra; Número; Espiral; Estrella; Vara (recta); Rueda; Otro
de: Form der Wunderkerze: Herz; Buchstabe; Zahl; Spirale; Stern; Stab (gerade); Rad; Sonstige
ko: 스파클러 모양: 하트; 문자; 숫자; 나선형; 별 모양; 막대형(직선형); 휠; 기타
tr: Maytap şekli: Kalp; Harf; Sayı; Spiral; Yıldız; Çubuk (düz); Çark; Diğer
fi: Tähtisadetikku: Sydän; Kirjain; Numero; Spiraali; Tähti; Tikku (suora); Pyörä; Muu
fr: Forme du cierge magique: Cœur; Lettre; Chiffre; Spirale; Étoile; Bâtonnet (droit); Roue; Autre
bg-BG: Форма на бенгалския огън: Сърце; Буква; Цифра; Спирала; Звезда; Пръчка (права); Колело; Друго
sl-SI: Oblika kresničke: Srce; Črka; Številka; Spirala; Zvezda; Paličica (ravna); Kolo; Drugo
vi: Hình dạng pháo hoa: Trái tim; Chữ cái; Chữ số; Xoắn ốc; Ngôi sao; Que (thẳng); Bánh xe; Khác
pl: Kształt zimnych ogni: Serce; Litera; Cyfra; Spirala; Gwiazda; Patyczek (prosty); Koło; Inne
en: Sparkler shape: Heart; Letter; Number; Spiral; Star; Stick (straight); Wheel; Other
ja: スパークラー形状: ハート; 文字; 数字; スパイラル; 星; スティック (ストレート); ホイール; その他
ru: Форма бенгальского огня: Сердце; Буква; Цифра; Спираль; Звезда; Палочка (прямая); Колесо; Другое
el: Σχήμα βεγγαλικού sparkler: Καρδιά; Γράμμα; Αριθμός; Σπιράλ; Αστέρι; Ξυλάκι (ίσιο); Τροχός; Άλλο
pt-PT: Forma da vela de ignição: Coração; Letra; Número; Espiral; Estrela; Vareta (reta); Roda; Outro
nb: Stjerneskuddform: Hjerte; Bokstav; Tall; Spiral; Stjerne; Pinne (rett); Hjul; Annet